North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-06 Credit Unions
6-06-15.
Duties and powers of supervisory committee.

The supervisory committee, by a majority vote, may call a special meeting of the members of the credit union to consider any matter which it wishes to submit to the membership. The supervisory committee shall:

Fill vacancies in the committee’s own membership.

Make an examination of the affairs of the credit union, including an audit of the credit union’s books, at least annually, and the committee may submit such report to the members of the credit union at a meeting called for that purpose by the committee whenever the committee deems such action necessary.

Make an annual audit and report and submit the audit and report at the annual meeting of the credit union.

Suspend any officer, director, or member of any committee when by unanimous, not including the person who is being considered for suspension, vote of the committee, such action is determined to be necessary to the proper conduct of the credit union, but upon taking such action, the committee shall call the members of the credit union together immediately to act on the suspension, and the members at the meeting may sustain the suspension and remove the officer permanently or may reinstate the officer, director, or committee member.

The commissioner may reject a supervisory committee examination or audit if the examination or audit is determined to be unsatisfactory.

If the bylaws do not provide for the election or appointment of a supervisory committee, the duties and powers described above are the responsibility of and delegated to the board of directors.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 6-0615; S.L. 1977, ch. 74, § 8; 1983, ch. 115, § 3; 1997, ch. 86, § 2.

6-06-16.
Entrance fee — Capital — Lien on shares — Assessment on shares.

A credit union may charge such entrance fee as may be provided by its bylaws. Its capital consists of the entrance fees paid in and the payments made to it by the several members on shares therein. The credit union has a lien on the shares and deposits of a member for any sum due to the credit union from that member or for the amount due on any loan endorsed by that member. A credit union that is a member of the North Dakota credit union league may, by resolution adopted with a quorum present at a regular or special meeting of the board of directors of the credit union, annually assess against the share accounts of all members of the credit union an amount equal to the whole or proportionate part of the annual membership fee payable to the North Dakota credit union league.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 6-0616; S.L. 1953, ch. 99, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 6-0616; S.L. 1977, ch. 74, § 9.

6-06-17.
Shares may be issued to minor or in trust.

Shares may be issued and deposits received in the name of a minor, or in trust, in such manner as the bylaws may provide. The name of the beneficiary must be disclosed to the credit union.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 6-0617.

6-06-18.
Interest rates. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 78, § 16.

6-06-19.
Authority to borrow — Limitation — Exception.

A credit union may borrow money from any source, but the total borrowings may not exceed twenty-five percent of the credit union’s assets unless the commissioner authorizes a larger amount. The board or commissioner may suspend or restrict the borrowing powers of a credit union. The limitation on borrowing does not apply to a corporate central credit union which is limited to borrowing up to five times the corporate central credit union’s capital, surplus, and reserve fund. For purposes of this section, capital, surplus, and reserve fund for a corporate central credit union includes statutory or regulatory reserves, reserves established for contingencies or any other purposes, undivided earnings, all sums on deposit by other credit unions which are membership capital share deposits as defined by the bylaws of the corporate central credit union, or any other funds being held by the corporate central credit union for the purpose of maintaining a capital base. A credit union must provide within one week written notification to the commissioner of the amount, terms, and source of all borrowings under this section. Written notification is not required if the borrowings are provided by the corporate central credit union and that information is available to the commissioner through electronic inquiry.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 15; R.C. 1943, § 6-0619; S.L. 1979, ch. 135, § 2; 1981, ch. 115, § 4; 1983, ch. 115, § 4; 1997, ch. 78, § 13; 1997, ch. 86, § 3; 2005, ch. 86, § 10.

6-06-20.
Borrowings of directors and committee members limited — Repayment of loans.

A director or member of any committee may not borrow from the credit union in which the director or member holds office more than one hundred thousand dollars plus pledged shares and deposits less any loan balance therein, unless the application is approved by three-fourths of the other members of the board of directors. The director or member may guarantee or endorse paper for other borrowers. A borrower may repay the borrower’s loan in whole or in part on any day that the office of the credit union is open for business.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 6-0620; S.L. 1975, ch. 74, § 3; 1987, ch. 117, § 1; 1995, ch. 90, § 1; 1997, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 86, § 11.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of statutes prohibiting or limiting loans to bank’s officers or directors, 49 A.L.R.3d 727.

6-06-21.
Reserve fund.

Every credit union, including corporate central credit unions, shall maintain an allowance for loan and lease loss account in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and rules of the national credit union administration. If it is found through an examination that the allowance for loan and lease loss account is not sufficient in disclosing the exposure to loan losses, then the credit union will increase the allowance for loan and lease loss account within thirty days as directed by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 17; 1939, ch. 117, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 6-0621; S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 8; 1979, ch. 135, § 3; 1983, ch. 115, § 5; 1993, ch. 76, § 2; 2003, ch. 70, § 1; 2005, ch. 86, § 12.

6-06-21.1.
Amount and manner of establishing special reserves for delinquent loans and investments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 86, § 16.

6-06-21.2.
Agricultural loan amortization and deferral. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 1989, ch. 99, § 3.

6-06-22.
Permanent loan fund — Amount — How obtained — Ownership. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 11.

6-06-23.
Use of permanent loan fund — To whom loaned and regulating making of loans. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 11.

6-06-24.
Renewal of loan from permanent loan fund — Foreclosure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 11.

6-06-25.
Rate of interest — Use of interest — Permanent loan fund loans. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 11.

6-06-26.
Dividends.

A credit union’s board of directors may declare and pay a dividend on shares from current or accumulated net earnings, or both, but only after providing for required reserves, accrued and unpaid expenses, and established loan and lease losses. A credit union may pay a dividend on partial or full shares and may pay the dividend at differing levels and at differing intervals based on the type of share accounts owned by a member, the liquidation priority of share accounts, and the balances of a member’s share accounts. A credit union may determine the rate and amount of a dividend before the end of the dividend period involved. A credit union, upon action of its board of directors, may authorize an interest refund to members of record at the close of business the last day of any dividend period in proportion to the interest paid during that dividend period. A credit union shall not pay a dividend if payment would result in the insolvency of the credit union.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 18; 1939, ch. 117, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 6-0626; S.L. 1951, ch. 104, § 7; 1957 Supp., § 6-0626; S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 10; 1975, ch. 70, § 3; 1981, ch. 119, § 2; 1997, ch. 78, § 15; 2005, ch. 86, § 13.

6-06-27.
Notice of intention to withdraw shares and deposits.

A credit union may require sixty days’ notice of intention to withdraw shares and thirty days’ notice of intention to withdraw deposits. Withdrawing members have no further rights in the credit union, but are not released from any remaining liability to it by such withdrawal. All amounts paid on shares or as deposits by a withdrawing member, and any dividends or interest credited to that member to the date of withdrawal, after all sums due from the member to the credit union have been deducted, must be repaid to the member as funds become available.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 19; R.C. 1943, § 6-0627; S.L. 1983, ch. 115, § 6.

6-06-28.
May change place of business.

A credit union may change its place of business on written permission of the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 21; R.C. 1943, § 6-0628.

6-06-29.
Taxation of credit unions.

Any credit union organized under this chapter or under the Federal Credit Union Act is exempt from all taxation now or hereafter imposed by the state or any municipality within the state or any local taxing authority and no law which taxes corporations in any form, or the shares thereof, or the accumulations thereon, shall apply to any such credit union, except that any real property and any tangible personal property owned by any credit union organized under this chapter or under the Federal Credit Union Act is subject to taxation to the same extent as other similar property is taxed and purchases by credit unions are subject to sales or use tax. The shares of credit unions are not subject to any stock transfer tax, either when issued or when transferred from one member to another. The participation by the credit union in any unemployment insurance funds, or social security fund, or old-age fund may not be deemed a waiver of the tax immunities hereby granted.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 22; R.C. 1943, § 6-0629; S.L. 1961, ch. 109, § 2; 1989, ch. 105, § 1.

Note.

The Federal Credit Union Act is compiled as 12 USCS § 1751 et seq.

6-06-30.
Voluntary liquidation authorized — Qualification of liquidating committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 90, § 13.

Note.

For present provisions, see ch. 6-06.1.

6-06-31.
Notice of dissolution to state examiner — Filing examiner’s certificates — When dissolution complete. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 90, § 13.

6-06-32.
Duty of committee when liquidation completed — State examiner custodian of books and papers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 90, § 13.

6-06-33.
Liquidation by the commissioner.

If the commissioner finds that a credit union is insolvent when the commissioner receives notice of its intention to dissolve, or if a credit union in the process of voluntary dissolution is not liquidated completely and its assets distributed within three years after the special meeting at which the dissolution was voted, the commissioner shall take possession of the books, records, and assets of the union and proceed to complete the liquidation in the manner provided in this title for the liquidation of closed banks.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 20, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 6-0633.

Cross-References.

Liquidation of banks, see ch. 6-07.

Voluntary liquidation of credit unions, see ch. 6-06.1.

6-06-34.
Unclaimed dividends of credit unions.

The commissioner shall transfer all unpaid dividends to the commissioner of university and school lands. The commissioner of university and school lands is authorized to issue a voucher for the payment of such dividends to the persons respectively entitled thereto, in accordance with the escheat and abandoned property laws of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 108, § 20, subs. e; R.C. 1943, § 6-0634; S.L. 1959, ch. 212, § 10; 1977, ch. 75, § 1.

6-06-35.
Conversion from state to federal credit union and from federal to state credit union and from state credit union to building and loan association.

A state credit union may be converted into a federal credit union under the laws of the United States by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for such conversion must first be approved, and a date set for a vote thereon by the members either at a meeting to be held on such date or by written ballot to be filed on or before such date, by a majority of the directors of the state credit union. Written notice of the proposition and of the date set for the vote must then be delivered in person to each member or mailed to each member at the address for such member appearing on the records of the credit union, not more than thirty nor less than seven days prior to such date. Approval of the proposition for conversion must be by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members present at the meeting.

A statement of the results of the vote, verified by the affidavits of the president or vice president and the secretary, must be filed with the state credit union board within ten days after the vote is taken.

Promptly after the vote is taken and in no event later than ninety days thereafter, if the proposition for conversion was approved by such vote, the credit union shall take such action as may be necessary under the applicable federal law to make it a federal credit union, and within ten days after receipt of the federal credit union charter there must be filed with the state credit union board a copy of the charter thus issued. Upon such filing, the credit union must cease to be a state credit union.

Upon ceasing to be a state credit union, such credit union is no longer subject to any of the provisions of the North Dakota credit union law. The successor federal credit union is vested with all of the assets and shall continue to be responsible for all of the obligations of the state credit union to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place.

A federal credit union, organized under the laws of the United States may be converted into a state credit union by:

Complying with all federal requirements requisite to enabling it to convert to a state credit union or to cease being a federal credit union;

Filing with the state credit union board proof of such compliance, satisfactory to the commissioner;

Filing with the commissioner an organization certificate and bylaws, both in triplicate, as required by section 6-06-02; and

Granting discretionary authority to the commissioner to conduct an examination prior to the conversion date.

When the commissioner has been satisfied that all of such requirements and all other requirements of the North Dakota law have been complied with, the commissioner shall notify the applicants and the state credit union board of that fact, and the board shall instruct the secretary of state to issue a charter in accordance with section 6-06-02. Upon issuance of the charter, the federal credit union shall become a state credit union and ceases to be a federal credit union. The state credit union is vested with all of the assets and shall continue to be responsible for all of the obligations of the federal credit union to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place.

After July 31, 2009, a state credit union may convert to a building and loan association by complying with the following requirements:

The proposal for a conversion first must be approved and a date set for a vote on the proposal by the members either at a meeting to be held on such date or by written ballot to be filed on or before such date by a majority of the directors of the credit union. Approval of the proposal for the conversion must be by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members voting.

A state credit union that proposes to convert to a building and loan association shall submit notice to each of the credit union’s members who are eligible to vote on the matter of the credit union’s intent to convert:

Ninety days before the date of the member vote on the conversion;

Sixty days before the date of the member vote on the conversion; and

Thirty days before the date of the member vote on the conversion.

A state credit union that proposes to convert to a building and loan association shall submit a notice to the state credit union board of the credit union’s intent to convert at least ninety days before the date of the completion of the conversion.

Upon completion of a conversion, the state credit union is no longer subject to any of the provisions of this chapter.

A director or senior management official of a state credit union may not receive any economic benefit in connection with a conversion of the state credit union other than reasonable director fees and reasonable compensation and other benefits paid to directors or senior management officials of the converted institution in the ordinary course of business. As used in this subdivision, the term senior management official means a chief executive officer, an assistant chief executive officer, a chief financial officer, and any other senior executive officer as may be defined by the state credit union board.

Before January 1, 2009, the state credit union board shall adopt rules applicable to state credit union conversion to a building and loan association which are consistent with the conversion rules of the national credit union administration.

The commissioner shall review the methodology by which the conversion member vote was taken and procedures applicable to the member vote. The commissioner shall report the commissioner’s findings to the state credit union board. If the commissioner or the state credit union board disapproves of the methods by which the conversion member vote was taken or procedures applicable to the member vote, the member vote must be retaken as directed by the commissioner or the state credit union board.

The commissioner shall set fees for such examination at an hourly rate sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department of financial institutions associated with the examination. Fees must be collected by the commissioner, transferred to the state treasurer, and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 109, § 3; 1977, ch. 74, § 10; 1981, ch. 115, § 5; 1989, ch. 98, § 6; 1991, ch. 85, § 3; 2001, ch. 88, § 23; 2007, ch. 78, § 4.

Cross-References.

Federal Credit Union Act, see 12 USCS § 1751 et seq.

6-06-36.
Merger.

Any credit union chartered under this chapter or under Act of Congress may merge under rules and regulations established by the state credit union board. A federal credit union proposing to merge into a state-chartered credit union shall grant the commissioner discretionary authority to conduct an examination. The commissioner shall set fees for such examination at an hourly rate sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department of financial institutions associated with the examination. Fees must be collected by the commissioner, transferred to the state treasurer, and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund. The secretary of state shall charge a fee of fifty dollars for all services in connection with a merger authorized by the state credit union board, including filing of a certificate of organization or bylaws, and issuing or canceling charters.

Upon approval by the state credit union board of a merger application under this section, the former main office and facilities of the credit union merged will become branches of the continuing credit union and the continuing credit union is not required to file an application for any branches acquired in the merger transaction.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 1; 1991, ch. 85, § 4; 1993, ch. 75, § 3; 2001, ch. 88, § 24; 2011, ch. 74, § 11.

6-06-37.
Rules and regulations.

The state credit union board shall prescribe rules and regulations regarding the merger, consolidation, and dissolution of corporations organized under this chapter and Acts of Congress.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 90, § 2.

6-06-38.
Destruction of records.

No credit union may be required to preserve and retain its records of accounts or files, except share and deposit files, for a longer period than six years next after the first day of January of the year following the final date of the termination of such accounts or files. No credit union may be required to preserve and retain its share and deposit account records and files for a longer period than two years next after the first day of January of the year following the date of the death of the shareholder or depositholder. All credit unions shall, however, keep sufficient records to satisfy the reporting requirements of the escheat and abandoned property laws of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 74, § 4; 1977, ch. 75, § 2.

6-06-39.
Share scaledown. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 86, § 16.

6-06-40.
Share insurance exception.

A central credit union with corporate shareholdings equal to or in excess of seventy-five percent of its total assets may by vote of its board of directors elect exemption of insurance of share and deposit accounts under provisions of title II of the Federal Credit Union Act.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 74, § 12; 1981, ch. 115, § 6.

6-06-41.
Depository credit union — Endorsements.

A depository credit union that has taken a check or draft for collection may supply any endorsement of the member which is necessary to title unless the item contains the words “payee’s endorsement required” or words to that effect. In the absence of such a requirement, a statement placed on the item by the depository credit union to the effect that the item was deposited by a member or credited to that member’s account is effective as the member’s endorsement. An intermediary credit union, or payor credit union, which is not a depository credit union, is neither given notice nor otherwise affected by a restrictive endorsement of any person except the credit union’s immediate transferor.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 118, § 1.